Washington statutes.
RCW 36.70.170

Director—Employees.

The director of planning shall be authorized to appoint such employees as are necessary to perform the duties assigned to him or her within the budget allowed.

[ 2009 c 549 s 4113; 1963 c 4 s 36.70.170. Prior: 1959 c 201 s 17.]